Utah statutes.
40-8-19.   Transfer of mining operation under approved notice of intention.

Whenever an operator succeeds to the interest of another operator who holds an approved notice of intention or revision covering a mining operation, by sale, assignment, lease, or other means, the division may release the first operator from his responsibilities under his approved notice of intention, including surety, provided the successor assumes all of the duties of the former operator, to the satisfaction of the division, under this approved notice of intention, including its then approved reclamation plan and the posting of surety. Upon the satisfactory assumption of such responsibilities by the successor operator, under conditions approved by the division, the approved notice of intention shall be transferred to the successor operator.

